Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 6

Limitation of Actions

48-18-601. Limitation of actions for breach of fiduciary duty.

Any action alleging breach of fiduciary duties by directors or officers, including alleged violations of the standards established in § 48-18-301, § 48-18-403 or part 7 of this chapter, must be brought within one (1) year from the date of such breach or violation; provided, that in the event the alleged breach or violation is not discovered nor reasonably should have been discovered within the one-year period, the period of limitation shall be one (1) year from the date such was discovered or reasonably should have been discovered. In no event shall any such action be brought more than three (3) years after the date on which the breach or violation occurred, except where there is fraudulent concealment on the part of the defendant, in which case the action shall be commenced within one (1) year after the alleged breach or violation is, or should have been, discovered.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.60; 2012, ch. 1051, § 35.

Law Reviews.

Unpacking Limited Liability: Direct and Vicarious Liability of Corporate Participants for Torts of the Enterprise (Robert B. Thompson), 47 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (1994).